Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6525
Act; purpose.

The purpose of the Defense Efforts Workforce Act is to provide incentives to encourage employers to locate their workforce in this state to support military defense efforts and foster the growth of the workforce required to advance global defense communications and technologies.

Laws 2025, LB649, § 2.
July 1, 2027